<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88504-0118 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-04-88.f2.A1117</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 86 / Wednesday, May 4, 1988 /Notices<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Social Security Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Demonstration Grants; Announcement of Fiscal Year (FY) 1988 ResearchDemonstration Program (RDP); Availability of Grant Funds and Request forApplications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Social Security Administration, HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Announcement of the availability of FY 1988 funds andrequest for applications under SSA's RDP.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>In FY 1987, SSA announced the beginning of its RDP. Thecurrent announcement pertains to SSA's RDP for FY 1988 and consists offour sections:andbullet; Section I provides background information, discusses the purposeof the RDP, lists funding authorities and briefly describes the applicationprocess.andbullet; Section II describes the programmatic priorities and subprioritiesunder which SSA is requesting applications for funding.andbullet; Section III describes in detail the application process.andbullet; Section IV provides guidance on how to prepare and submit an application.ALL OF THE FORMS AND INSTRUCTIONS NECESSARY TO SUBMIT AN APPLICATION AREPUBLISHED AS PART OF THIS ANNOUNCEMENT FOLLOWING SECTION IV. THEREFORE,NO SEPARATE APPLICATION KIT IS NEEDED FOR SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION. THECLOSING DATE FOR SUBMISSION OF APPLICATIONS IS <T3>JUNE 30, 1988. </T3>(SEE SECTION III, PART I.)<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>For purposes of this announcement, we are using the SocialSecurity Disability Insurance (DI) program terms ``beneficiary'' and ``benefit''to also represent the Supplemental Security Income (SSI) Program terms``recipient'' and ``payment.''</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Social Security Administration,Division of Disability Program Information and Studies, 6401 Security Boulevard,Room 2223 Annex Building, Baltimore, Maryland 21235, Telephone: (301) 965-0105.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Section I_Preamble</ITAG>A. Goals of the Social Security Administration (SSA)A major goal of SSA is to assist Social Security Disability Insurance (DI)and Supplemental Security Income (SSI) disabled and blind beneficiarieswho have the potential to return to work. SSA is seeking to test new approachesto achieve this goal. These include more effective and efficient use ofavailable vocational rehabilitation (VR) and to the employment services,and new work incentives (WI).SSA's focus is on significantly improved integration and use of VR andother employment program resources for our beneficiaries. This reflectsa national concern with assisting disabled persons to become more productivecontributors to the economy, while enhancing their self-esteem. This concernwas recently expressed in the report of the Disability Advisory Council(DAC) which was commissioned by the Congress to study and make recommendationsrelated to SSA's disability and VR programs. In its report, the DAC emphasizedthat the Social Security Administration should strongly emphasize employmentand attainment of self-sufficiency for disability beneficiaries and conductdemonstrations to test effective methods to achieve this goal. SSA wishesto directly achieve this goal and is seeking to test new approaches which,if successful, can lead to the introduction of effective policies and programsof employment services for our beneficiary populations throughout the country.One of SSA's highest priorities for achieving these goals is to help andassure that as many beneficiaries as possible return to work at a levelof earnings that will end or reduce dependency on SSA's disability programs.Currently, there are about 4 million disabled (and blind) beneficiarieson the DI rolls, and 2.9 million disabled and blind on the SSI rolls. Totalcosts in payments to DI and SSI blind and disabled in 1987 (the latestyear such figures are available) were 28.4 billion dollars. Over the years,most persons coming onto the rolls have remained there, but we know fromsurvey information on and group interviews of our DI beneficiaries (whogenerally have extensive and recent work experience when they apply fordisability) and from surveys of SSI beneficiaries as well as the growthin the use of WI features of the SSI program, that many would prefer todo some form of work, if the conditions were favorable. This might includeconditions such as: An accommodating employer; assistance in finding anew position; encouragement and support; skills enhancement; transportation;alternative coverage of customary medical costs; various economic incentives;a longer trial work period (TWP) (e.g., for transitional employment); orsome degree of medical improvement/rehabilitation leading to employment.We are seeking projects designed to make the most effective and efficientuse of existing rehabilitation and employment service programs and systems,and for the creative application of available resources and technologiesto assist beneficiaries to return to work. These projects should clearlycontribute to SSA's employment priorities including:andbullet; information that will lead to programmatic changes to systematicallyincrease the number of beneficiaries who return to work;andbullet; methods of linking beneficiaries with employment assistance thatfeature cost-effective, state-of-the-art techniques;andbullet; more efficient and effective mechanisms for identifying and referringcandidates for rehabilitation and employment services;andbullet; increased access by beneficiaries to employment service systemsand networks;andbullet; more effective and efficient employment intervention for beneficiaries;andandbullet; more effective incentives for rehabilitation and employment.B. Research Demonstration Program (RDP) of SSAThe RDP is designed to coordinate several funding authorities and to serveas SSA's major demonstration effort on behalf of both the DI and SSI disabledand blind populations in a single <T4>Federal Register </T4>announcement. This nationwide competition toselect demonstration projects designed to stimulate, test and coordinateeffective approaches toward employment assistance is part of an innovativeand systematic SSA-wide initiative for assisting beneficiaries to enterthe workforce or return to work.SSA expects to use grant funds to begin a series of employment demonstrationsof national significance in FY 1988. We anticipate funding up to 50 demonstrationgrants totaling about 6 million dollars. In general, demonstration activitiesare intended to add to existing knowledge and to improve methods and techniques.Additionally, priority will be placed on selection of approaches that arecost-effective, can be replicated, and show promise for improvement ofsystems for the coordination of effective employment opportunities forSSA's disability populations. Priority area in this announcement request innovative demonstrations whichextend and enhance employment outcomes for DI and SSI beneficiaries, includingapproaches which fill gaps in existing programs, link programs with publicand private sector employment services, or create and test entirely newmechanisms to assist beneficiaries to secure employment. APPLICATIONS WHICHREPLICATE EXISTING EMPLOYMENT STRATEGIES ARE NOT BEING SOUGHT, UNLESS THESEIDEAS INCLUDE A MAJOR NEW COMPONENT WHICH WILL LEAD TO SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTIN EMPLOYMENT OUTCOMES FOR DI AND SSI BENEFICIARIES. In addition to these concerns, SSA wishes to pursue demonstrations suggestedin the recent report of the Disability Advisory Council (DAC). The DACwas mandated by section 12101 of Pub. L. 99-272 to study and make recommendationsrelated to the effectiveness of VR services for DI and SSI beneficiaries,the use of specialists for medical/vocational evaluations, alternativeapproaches to medical evaluations, and possible criteria for assessingthe probability that an applicant or recipient of disability benefits mightbenefits from rehabilitation services. The DAC was chartered by the Commissionerof Social Security on July 3, 1986, and its final report was transmittedby the Secretary of Health and Human Services (HHS) to the Congress andthe Board of Trustees of the Disability Insurance Trust Fund on March 11,1988. The DAC heard testimony from many experts in VR, medical/work evaluations,Social Security policy, and the economic implications of SSA's disabilityprograms. After more than a year of study, the DAC concluded that SSA shouldfurther emphasize return to work as the appropriate goal of SSA's VR effortsand that SSA needs to develop additional ways to get many more of its disabilitybeneficiaries into VR and programs leading to permanent employment. Indeveloping new VR/employment strategies, the DAC recommended that SSA conductdemonstrations, using all available sources of VR services (both publicand private) and emphasizing case management and client/counselor cooperationto achieve maximum efficiency and effectiveness in returning disabilitybeneficiaries to employment. Many of these recommendations are reflectedin the specific demonstration topics requested under the priority areasin this announcement. SSA is particularly interested in approaches that: (a) Link the resourcesof Federal and State agencies serving DI or SSI beneficiaries; (b) linkthe resources of Federal, State, and private agencies; (c) link SSA programswith private employers or employer associations possibly including PrivateIndustry Councils (PICs); (d) link Federal and/or State resources withprivate sector organizations serving the disabled; and/or (e) promote additionalprivate sector involvement with DI and SSI beneficiaries, e.g., directjob development and placement of beneficiaries or innovative uses of rehabilitationengineering techniques to return beneficiaries to the workforce. C. Legislative Authorities Authority for this activity is contained in sections 702 and 1110(a) ofthe Social Security Act (the Act), for projects to promote economic securityand reduced dependency; section 1110(b) of the Act, for projects that assistin promoting the objectives or facilitate the administration of the SSIprogram; and section 505(a) of Public Law (Pub. L.) 96-265, for projectsto improve employment outcomes for DI beneficiaries. In addition, section505(a) of Pub. L. 96-265, as extended by Pub. L. 99-272, section 12101,requires the Secretary of HHS to test new forms of rehabilitation and otheremployment-related initiatives that will help DI beneficiaries return towork. It should be noted that certain of these authorities contain the flexibilityto waive provisions of the Act to test new employment service arrangementsand WI on a demonstration basis. Specifically, section 505(a)(3) authorizesthe Secretary to waive titles II (DI) and XVIII (Medicare) benefit restrictions.Additionally, section 1110(b) authorizes the Secretary to waive requirements,conditions or limitations of title XVI (SSI), subject to certain safeguardssuch as voluntary participation by SSI recipients. The waiver authorityunder both titles has been redelegated by the Secretary to the Commissionerof SSA. Under sections 702 and 1110 (a) and (b), SSA anticipates funding projectsin the last quarter of FY 1988, or first quarter of FY 1989. However, section505(a) requires that ``no experiment or project shall be actually placedin operation unless at least 90 days prior thereto a written report, preparedfor purposes of notification and information only, and containing a fulland complete description thereof, has been transmitted by the Secretaryto the Committee on Ways and Means of the House of Representatives andto the Committee on Finance of the Senate.'' Additional processing timewill be required to fulfill this requirement.D. Competitive Review of ApplicationsApplications received under this announcement will be reviewed competitivelyagainst the evaluation criteria of this announcement (see Section III)by qualified independent reviewers. SSA will use these evaluations as anelement in the selection process. The results of this review will assistSSA in deciding which applications should receive funding.E. Background<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Definition of Disability</ITAG>SSA administers two programs (DI and SSI) for the disabled, as well asa separate SSI program for the blind. (The DI program for the disabledcovers disabled blind.) The DI and SSI programs use the same definitionof disability and overlap to some extent, but they differ in significantways.The statutory definition of disability for both programs is: <T3>inability to engage in any substantial gainful activity (SGA) by reasonof any medically determinable physical or mental impairment which has lastedor would be expected to last for a continuous period of 12 months or resultin death. </T3>There is a separate statutory definition of blindness forthe SSI blind program.To qualify for DI benefits on this or her own earnings record, a disabledperson must meet the definition of disability, and also meet an ``insuredstatus'' requirement (sufficient past work in Social Security covered employment).To qualify for SSI benefits a disabled or blind person must meet the definitionof disability or blindness and also meet certain other eligibility requirements,including an income and resources (financial need) test.New DI beneficiaries must wait 5 months from the onset of disability toreceive cash benefits, and another 24 months to qualify for Medicare benefits.A waiting period is not required for new SSI beneficiaries to qualify forcash benefits and Medicaid benefits (in those States that provide Medicaidbased on SSI eligibility).With certain exceptions, DI benefits generally continue until death orage 65 unless the beneficiary medically improves or performs SGA. OrdinarilySSA considers a person to be performing SGA when his or her earnings (excludingsubsidies and certain impairment-related work expenses) average more than$300 per month ($700 for blind DI beneficiaries who are subject to differentrules).SSI benefits generally continue until death with no age cut-off unlessthe beneficiary medically improves or ceases to meet other eligibilityrequirements, such as the income and resources test. SGA is not a factorfor SSI beneficiaries who perform work after entitlement (see No. 3 below,Work Incentives).<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Determination of Disability</ITAG>While SSA's disability programs are Federally administered and funded,SSA uses State agencies, generically known as disability determinationservices (DDSs) to determine disability and blindness. Thirty-seven ofthese DDSs operate under a State vocational rehabilitation agency (VRA).The remainder operate under a State umbrella agency, under a welfare agencyor as an independent State agency.Social Security regulations provide a five-step sequential evaluation processwhich is used in determining whether a claimant meets the legal definitionof disability. When a decision that an individual is or is not disabledcan be made at any step, evaluation under subsequent steps is not necessary.In this way, an eligibility decision for a claim is made as quickly andefficiently as possible.The first consideration, except for the SSI blind who are not subject toan SGA standard, is whether the applicant is performing SGA. If a DI orSSI applicant is performing SGA, his/her claim will be denied.Second, the individual's medical condition is considered to determine whetherhis/her impairment(s) has more than a minimal effect on the individual'sability(ies) to perform basic work-related functions such as walking, lifting,and following simple instructions. If the impairment(s) does not imposesuch a restriction on physical or mental capacities, the claim is deniedfor lack of necessary severity. Next, if the individual is not performing SGA and has an impairment whichhas more than a minimal effect on the individual's ability(ies) to performwork-related functions, the individual's medical condition is comparedwith the criteria set forth in SSA's Listing of Impairments in the SocialSecurity regulations. If the impairment(s) meets the listed criteria, oris medically equivalent to those criteria, the claim is allowed withoutfurther evaluation. If a claim has not been decided at any of the earlier steps in the sequentialevaluation process, the individual's ability to perform work-related physicaland mental activities is determined based on all of the relevant medicalevidence. This determination of residual functional capacity (RFC) is thencompared with the demands of his/her past work. If the individual retainsthe capacity to perform work done in the past, the claim is denied. A claim that cannot be decided at this step in the process is further evaluatedto determine whether the individual can return to work other than pastwork. In making this determination, the individual's age, education, andwork experience are considered, as well as RFC. This is only a general description of the sequential evaluation processfor determining disability. The sequential evaluation process does notapply in full to DI claims for widows, widowers, or surviving divorcedspouses, or to SSI claims for children under age 18. To be eligible underthe criteria in the law, these claimants must have an impairment(s) whichis so severe that it meets (or is equivalent to) the medical criteria inthe Listing of Impairments. Also, blindness determinations for SSI claimantsare based on medical criteria prescribed by statute and do not follow thedisability evaluation process. 3. Work Incentives Prior to 1980, there were few WI for DI or SSI beneficiaries. The SocialSecurity Disability Amendments of 1980 (P.L. 96-265) added some new incentives.The Employment Opportunities for Disabled Americans Act, P.L. 99-643, liberalizedsome of these incentives for SSI beneficiaries effective July 1, 1987,and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987, P.L. 100-203, addedstill additional DI incentives effective January 1, 1988. Major DI WI for beneficiaries who do not medically improve include: andbullet; A 9-month TWP and a 3-month grace period for individuals who work:This offers a disabled beneficiary an opportunity to test his/her abilityto work without losing benefits. Under this provision, the beneficiaryis credited with a month of work for each month that earnings exceed 75dollars (or 15 hours of work for the self-employed). When the beneficiaryhas accumulated 9 such months (not necessarily consecutive), the TWP iscompleted. After the TWP, SSA will determine whether the work the individualperformed during the TWP was SGA. If SSA determines that the individualis no longer disabled, the beneficiary will receive benefits for the monthdisability ceases and at least the next 2 months (the 3-month ``grace period'').andbullet; A 36-month reentitlement period: This provision provides a reentitlement period for disabled persons whocomplete a TWP and continue to have a disabling impairment. It is not anextension of the TWP, but rather a period during which benefits can bereinstated without need for a new application, disability determinationor waiting period if the person's work falls below the SGA level. andbullet; An extension of Medicare coverage:Medicare coverage for DI beneficiaries who have not medically recoveredwill continue for 39 months following the end of the TWP or until the lastmonth of payment of disability benefits, whichever is later. For individualswhose disability benefit entitlement ends for reasons other than SGA, Medicarecoverage ends at the same time disability benefits end.andbullet; Elimination of second waiting period for Medicare for people whobecome reentitled to disability benefits based on the same medical condition:Prior to 1988, a beneficiary who became entitled to DI benefits more than5 years after his/her previous entitlement to DI benefits terminated hadto serve another 24-month waiting period before Medicare coverage couldbegin. Now, a person who becomes reentitled to DI benefits on the basisof an impairment that is the same or directly related to the impairmentthat was the basis for the previous entitlement does not have to serveanother 24-month waiting period for Medicare benefits; months in the previousperiod of disability would count towards the 24-month waiting period.andbullet; Deduction of impairment-related work expensesThe cost of impairment-related items and services <T3>that a person needs in order to work </T3>can be deducted from earningsin determinations of SGA, even if these items and services are also neededfor non-work activities. The person must not have been nor expect to bereimbursed for the expenses.Major SSI WI for beneficiaries who do not medically improve now include:andbullet; Section 1619(a)_Special SSI Payments:This incentive allows special SSI cash payments to <T3>disabled </T3>persons on the rolls, in place of their regular SSI paymentswhen their earnings are at the amount ordinarily designated as the SGAlevel. (<T3>It does not apply to blind SSI recipients.</T3>) To qualify for thisincentive, the person must continue to have the original disabling impairmentunder which eligibility for SSI was initially determined and currentlymeet all other eligibility rules including the income and resources tests.People who receive special SSI cash benefits keep their disability statusuntil they are determined to have medically improved or are terminatedfor a nondisability-related reason(s). If the earnings of a person receivingspecial SSI cash benefits drops below the SGA level, the individual willbe paid regular SSI benefits if all other eligibility requirements aremet. Individuals who receive special SSI cash benefits are SSI recipientsfor all purposes, including Medicaid eligibility determinations. Underthe special rules, the individual's payment amount is still calculatedin the same way as regular SSI cash benefits (e.g., as earnings rise, theSSI benefit is reduced according to a formula).andbullet; Section 1619(b)_Recipient Status for MedicaidThis incentive is important because it protects Medicaid benefits (if theState provides Medicaid coverage to SSI eligibles) when income is too highfor cash payments but not high enough to replace the loss of Medicaid.This incentive continues Medicaid coverage for <T3>working disabled or blind </T3>people under age 65 when their incomebecomes high enough to cause SSI cash benefits or Federally-administeredState supplementary payments to stop. To qualify for extended Medicaidcoverage under section 1619(b), a person must:<ITAG tagnum="15">_continue to have a disabling condition or continue to be blind;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_need Medicaid in order to continue to work;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_be unable to afford benefits equivalent to the SSI Federally-administeredState supplementary payments, Medicaid coverage and publicly funded attendantcare services (including personal care assistance) the person would beeligible for if he/she were not working; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_meet all nondisability requirements for SSI payment other than earnings.</ITAG>andbullet; Plan for Achieving Self-Support (PASS)PASS can help an individual establish or maintain SSI eligibility and canalso increase the individual's SSI payment amount. It allows a disabledor blind person to set aside income and/or resources for a specified periodof time for a work goal such as education, vocational training, startinga business, or the purchase of work-related equipment. A plan is for SSIbenefits only and does <T3>not</T3> affect an SGA determination. Income and resources that areset aside are excluded only under the SSI income and resources test.The individual must have a feasible work goal, a specific savings/spendingplan, and must provide for a clearly identifiable accounting for the fundswhich are set aside. The plan must be in writing and have a specific timeframe.andbullet; Impairment-Related Work Expenses (IRWE)The cost of certain impairment-related services and items that a personneeds in order to work can be deducted from earnings in determinationsof SGA, even if these items and services are also needed for nonwork activities.IRWE are also excluded from earned income in determining an SSI recipient'smonthly payment amount. However, individuals must first etablish FederalSSI eligibility without the IRWE expenses exclusion.andbullet; Blind Work Expenses (BWE)Any earned income of a blind person which is used to meet any expensesreasonably attributable to earning the income is not counted in determiningSSI eligibility and payment amount if the blind person is under age 65;or age 65 or older and received SSI payments due to blindness (or receivedpayments under a former State plan for aid to the blind) for the monthbefore he/she attained age 65. A BWE need not relate directly to an individual'sblindness; it need only be a work-related expense of the individual.4. Current SSA VR program:SSA's VR program generally operates as follows:andbullet; SSA's field offices (FOs) alert new disability or blindness applicantsthat they might be referred to a State VRA. SSA now uses only State VRAsto provide reimbursable VR services.andbullet; The State DDSs, the agencies that collect the medical informationand make SSA's disability and blindness determinations, screen claims forpossible VR referrals in conjunction with determining whether the applicantsare disabled or blind. The DDS screening for VR is a manual process, generallycarried out by disability examiners, using gross screening criteria andrelying on medical and vocational information collected for purposes ofdetermining disability or blindness. Generally, no special informationis gathered for VR assessment.andbullet; DDSs refer selected disability or blindness applicants (both beneficiariesand non-beneficiaries) to State VRAs. DDSs provide copies of the disabilityor blindness determination and relevant medical and vocational informationto the State VRAs.andbullet; The State VRAs decide which of the DDS referrals appear to begood candidates for VR and should be contacted. Disability beneficiarieswho apply to these agencies for VR are subject to the same standards ofeligibility as others served by the agencies. Those who are determinedeligible for VR are substantively and consensually involved in the developmentof an ``individualized written rehabilitation program [plan].'' State VReligibility and service decisions are based on the Rehabilitation Act of1973.andbullet; SSA reimburses the State VRAs for the costs of certain VR servicesprovided to DI and SSI beneficiaries. With certain exceptions, reimbursementmay be made only for those VR services that result in beneficiaries performingSGA for a continuous period of 9 months.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section II_Priority Areas</ITAG>In developing the priority areas for the FY 1988 RDP, SSA has reviewedand updated the critical needs of its disability programs based on:andbullet; suggestions by rehabilitation and employment professionals;andbullet; recommendations from SSA's central and regional offices;andbullet; results of prior research and demonstration activities;andbullet; grant awards made under the FY 1987 RDP; andandbullet; recommendations from the DAC.The current critical needs of SSA's program to help beneficiaries who haveability to work include:andbullet; early intervention;andbullet; rapid assessment;andbullet; improved coordinated referral; andandbullet; management of service provision that is cost-effective in achievingsustained employment outcome.The priorities that follow focus primarily on employment assistance. Inreviewing proposals, SSA will also consider proposed WI features (e.g.,extension of TWP) that are potentially cost-effective and administrativelyfeasible on a demonstration basis and that are proposed using methods thatwill effectively measure their impact.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Because new WI affect the structure of SSA's disabilityprograms and have major policy and cost implications, testing of new WIgenerally must be carried out on a sufficient scale and using appropriateexperimental designs, to assure that findings are representative, can begeneralized, and provide definitive information on impact. Additionally,WI involving benefit adjustments cannot be tested without manipulationof SSA's benefit records, thus such tests require SSA management. Thisincludes testing of a benefit offset (reduction of benefits based on earnings).</ITAG>SSA RECOGNIZES THAT THE SCOPE OF WORK OF ANY SINGLE APPLICATION MAY ADDRESSASPECTS OF SEVERAL OF THE PRIORITY OR SUBPRIORITY AREAS LISTED. IN SELECTINGTHE <T3>ONE</T3> PRIORITY AND SUBPRIORITY AREA UNDER WHICH YOUR PROPOSAL WILLBE REVIEWED, PLEASE SELECT THE SINGLE PRIORITY OR SUBPRIORITY AREA WHICHMOST CLEARLY MATCHES THE OVERALL PURPOSE OF THE PROJECT BEING PROPOSED.SSA WILL NOT ASSIST APPLICANTS IN MAKING THIS SELECTION. SUBPRIORITY AREAS(E.G., 4.1, 4.6, ETC.) ENDING WITH THE WORD ``RESEARCH'' ARE INTENDED TOBE RESEARCH PROJECTS AS CONTRASTED WITH DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS. GRANTEEMATCHING OR COST-SHARING REQUIREMENTS DIFFER FOR RESEARCH AND DEMONSTRATIONPROJECTS. (SEE SECTION III, PART C).The programmatic priority areas of SSA's RDP are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 1.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Comprehensive and Systematic Employment Assistance.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 2.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Better Coordination Between Public and Private Sector Programs to IncreaseBeneficiary Interest in and Access to Employment.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 3.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Strategies for Assisting Members of the Disability Population withLimited Access to Employment Services.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 4.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Mechanisms for Matching Beneficiaries with Employment and EmploymentAssistance.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 5.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>State Vocational Rehabilitation Systems Improvement.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 6.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Application of New Technologies to Assist Return to Employment.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 7.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Communication and Marketing of Work Incentives, Vocational Rehabilitationand Employment Information to Directly Assist Beneficiaries in Returningto Work.</T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 8.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Development of State-of-the-Art Information on the Functional Capacityand Compatible Occupations for Persons With Various Impairments. </T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 9.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Improved Interagency Record Matching. </T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 10.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Special Studies. </T3><ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 11.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/><T3>Nonpriority Area Projects. </T3>Descriptions of Priority and SubpriorityAreas <ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 1.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/>Comprehensive and Systematic Employment Assistance Under the RDP, SSA has identified and tested different approaches to assistdisabled beneficiaries to return to work. Preliminary findings suggestmany of our beneficiaries would return if they were provided with comprehensiveand systematic VR and employment services which were appropriately targetedand responsive to their actual employment needs. Identification and testingof the most promising forms of employment assistance is underway. The followingkey elements are needed for a comprehensive approach to employment assistance:andbullet; early and cost-effective client assessment; andbullet; rapid referral to needed employment services; andbullet; managed service provision to assure appropriate, timely and cost-effectiveservice delivery; andbullet; methods to assure employment outcome; and andbullet; cost management and cost containment measures for the entire rehabilitationand employment process. <T3>1.1 Comprehensive Employment Services Using Case Management. </T3>SSAis seeking a medium-to-large-scale demonstration project to provide beneficiarieswith consistent and comprehensive employment services using a case managementapproach. Proposals should include cost-containment mechanisms to assureeffective and cost-beneficial service provision. Projects can include testsof direct beneficiary involvement in the development of plans to returnto work and in the selection of VR/employment service providers. Such aproject must be of sufficient size and scope to permit a scientific evaluationof outcome and must involve use of multiple rehabilitation and employmentservice providers through a case management system. The demonstration shouldinvolve the use of case managers who operate outside of the SSA field structureand are able to establish effective, replicable linkages with and betweenSSA FOs, beneficiaries, and multiple employment service providers. Theproject should clearly focus on SSA's critical needs: early intervention;rapid assessment; coordinated referral; and management of service provisionto achieve sustained employment outcome. And, the project should test acomprehensive employment approach for SSA beneficiaries. Also, the projectmust include a carefully and thoroughly designed evaluation component usingobjective evaluative expertise which will provide appropriate scientificevidence on outcomes and include evaluation of costs and benefits usingaccepted cost-benefit analysis techniques. The project may focus on a regionalarea of the nation, but should produce results which could be used on anational basis. <ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 2.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14"/>Better Coordination Between Public and Private Sector Programsto Increase Beneficiary Interests in and Access to EmploymentA commonly observed problem for beneficiaries considering employment isthe lack of coordination between public and private sector programs designedto assist people with disabilities. Beneficiaries may encounter conflictinggoals and eligibility requirements, misinformation about the interactionof programs, and lack of cooperation between program representatives. Thisresults in severely limiting the effectiveness of such programs. <T3>2.1 Public and Private Sector Program Collaborations. </T3>SSA is interestedin demonstrating collaboration and cooperation to increase employment opportunitiesfor disabled beneficiaries. This collaboration and cooperation could involveSSA and employers, private insurers, PICs, labor unions, hospitals, StateVRAs, State offices for mental retardation and mental health, private VRorganizations, employment agencies, disability organizations, self-helporganizations, residential programs, etc. Potential areas of collaborationand cooperation include informing beneficiaries about program interactionsand available assistance, developing job opportunities, training and accommodation,shared funding of employment assistance, access to private medical benefitsand services, and State VRA cooperation with other public sector, nonprofitor private sector employment service organizations in providing servicesto beneficiaries. Where possible, such cooperation could also involve useof the Targeted Jobs Tax Credit and/or available on-the-job training fundsprovided through the Job Training Partnership Act. SSA is seeking coordinated <T3>programs </T3>based on the collaborative efforts of two or more agenciesor organizations. These programs should target DI/SSI beneficiaries andbe programs should target DI SSI beneficiaries and be structured so thatassessment, referral, intervention, and employment components are used.Efforts should be made to use existing employment networks. Projects mustinclude specific and measurable employment outcomes, be cost beneficialand have potential for national replication. <T3>2.2 Worker's Compensation and Costs Risl Reduction. </T3>Some studyfindings have indicated that one barrier which prevents rehabilitated clientsfrom obtaining jobs is employers' concerns about worker's compensationliability. Although most states have established ``second injury funds,''this apparently has not entirely alleviated the problem. Therefore, SSA is seeking small-scale employment demonstrations involvingplacement of beneficiaries in competitive employment. These demonstrationsshould involve collaboration and cooperation between employers, insurers,other organizations, and/or SSA to reduce the risk which employers facefor worker's compensation payments for beneficiaries who become employed.The risk reduction period should be for a limited time, not to exceed 2years and cost-sharing of the worker's compensation payment risk is anticipated.Additionally, these demonstrations must include the following fundamentalelements:(1) Identification of beneficiaries for employment;(2) Identification of employers and specific placement opportunities;(3) A specific approach which defines how employer worker's compensationrisk will be reduced; and(4) An evaluation plan that clearly indicates the differential enhancementof employability for these beneficiaries.<T3>2.3 Referral to Part-time and Full-time Trial Work Opportunities. </T3>Inaddition to coordinated public and private sector employment programs,SSA is also seeking innovative proposals for demonstrations to aid disabledbeneficiaries in trying out their capacity to perform competitive employmentthrough temporary short-term employment (e.g., 6 months or less) in realwork settings. SSA believes that in general, more use of trial work canassist many more beneficiaries to secure permanent, competitive employmentand ultimately reduce dependency on/or leave the disability benefit rolls.This might involve planned phases from part-time to full-time work, theuse of major employers who would implement temporary trial work programsfor the disabled, or testing trial work opportunities in communities representativeof typical employment centers, including employment with large corporationsor small employers.One particular area of interest would be a test using both private andpublic referral sources in the development of such trial work opportunities.Another possible approach would involve opportunities for temporary trialwork in the home that would be linked to competitive work opportunitiesoutside the home once full-time work capacity was established. Waiver ofelements of the existing TWP is available and will be considered is requested.<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 3.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Strategies for assisting members of the disability population withlimited access to employment services</ITAG>While a significant portion of disability beneficiaries have indicatedthat they want to work, not all segments of the disability population havehad the same opportunities for employment or employment assistance. Therehave been dramatic and innovative advances in the treatment and rehabilitationof various severe impairments, such as cardiovascular and musculoskeletalproblems. And, these treatments have led to restoration of functional capacityand return to employment. However, too few disability beneficiaries havehad the opportunity to benefit from these advances and obtain assistancein locating employment.SSA is interested in exploring new methods and techniques for particulargroups of beneficiaries, but such efforts must reflect a service modelthat relates to the SSA program and demonstrate generic VR/employment methodswhich could be replicated and accessed systematically by SSA for use withbeneficiary groups.SSA is interested in supporting demonstrations that will increase rehabilitationand employment opportunities for these specialized beneficiary populations.These projects must be designed to enable disability beneficiaries to achieveSGA, must be innovative and must test comprehensive VR/employment interventionswhich include the following key components: early intervention, rapid assessment,improved coordinated referral, and management of service provision to achieveemployment outcome. We are interested in the replication potential of thesestrategies. In addition, an objective evaluation design must be proposedwhich specifically addresses the issue of replicability with particularattention to measuring the efficiency, effectiveness and cost-benefit ratioof the techniques used when integrated with SSA disability program operations.Populations of particular interest are:3.1 beneficiaries over age 50;3.2 SSI beneficiaries with little or no employment history in need of employmentservices;3.3 beneficiaries disabled based on cardiovascular disease;3.4 beneficiaries disabled based on respiratory disease;3.5 beneficiaries disabled based on traumatic brain injury;3.6 beneficiaries disabled based on chronic mental illuess;3.7 beneficiaries disabled based on drug addiction or alcoholism; and3.8 beneficiaries disabled based on orthopedic injuries.<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 4.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Mechanisms for Matching Beneficiaries With Employment and EmploymentAssistance</ITAG>One of the greatest difficulties for organizations attempting to help disabilitybeneficiaries return to work has been the lack of a reliable mechanism(s)for matching beneficiaries with available and appropriate employment andemployment assistance. Survey information has indicated that many beneficiarieswant to work. Numerous employers have volunteered to hire beneficiariesand many organizations have offered to assist beneficiaries in preparingfor and obtaining employment. However, there has been only limited successin actually making the necessary linkages between beneficiaries and employersor employment assistance. SSA is interested in supporting the developmentof effective and efficient screening and referral models that will linkdisability beneficiaries to employment assistance and direct job opportunities.These demonstrations must be designed to rapidly and efficiently link beneficiarieswith appropriate employment opportunities and job assistance services.And, the techniques used must be replicable within SSA's disability programs.<T3>4.1 Screening for Vocational Rehabilitation. </T3>Currently, the StateDDSs use model screening criteria to identify disability applicants whowill benefit from State VR services. Originally developed by a Federal/Stateworkgroup, these criteria are unvalidated and of questionable effectiveness.(A copy of these criteria may be obtained from any local DDS or from SSA.)SSA would support promising proposals for developing and validating newand effective screening criteria to identify good candidates for VR andemployment services who will return to SGA. (Note: Proposals to developnew screening systems <T3>must</T3> also include validation.) SSA is particularly interestedin testing systems involving criteria which can be rapidly applied usingcomputer automation, or other technical advances which are cost-effectiveand which can be validated through appropriate evaluative techniques (research).<T3>4.2 Mechanisms for Matching Beneficiaries with Available and AppropriateEmployment Assistance. </T3>Since prior SSA demonstrations have shown thatprivate sector employment assistance is available and can be effectivein helping beneficiaries return to work, it is necessary to develop methodsfor matching beneficiaries with these services.SSA is not aware of any available and validated mechanism(s) that couldbe used to match disability beneficiaries with the most suitable publicor private sector employment assistance.SSA is interested in supporting development and validation of mechanism(s)that could be used to screen and match beneficiaries with the most effectiveand efficient employment assistance. This could include mechanisms thatfeature:andbullet; information on employment trends, available jobs (e.g., job banks)and job requirements;andbullet; employment-related rehabilitation services;andbullet; a practical and cost-effective method of determining beneficiaries'motivation to return to work; andandbullet; information on job accommodation needs.SSA is interested not only in matching models that have general applicabilitybut also those that are appropriate for specific physical and mental impairments.Proposals in this subpriority area should not be designed to develop jobmatching systems alone but should focus on systems which screen beneficiaries,identify appropriate and cost-effective employment services and/or jobopportunities, and create methods of linking beneficiaries with services/jobs.<T3>4.3 Referral to Providers. </T3>Following the matching of beneficiarieswith potential employers or employment services, SSA is seeking rapid referralsystems which could be implemented to move clients to providers efficiently,track the services provided, and also provide continuous data on costsof services and outcomes. Such projects should involve automated capabilityto refer, track, and monitor the progress of beneficiaries being providedemployment services and/or jobs. And, such systems should be highly cost-effectiveand capable of being used with locally available SSA computer capacity.<T3>4.4 Screening of Mentally Retarded Clients. </T3>Demonstrations ofon-the-job (transitional employment) training for the retarded have indicatedthat the trainee's motivation to succeed, or at least to cooperate, isa major factor in successful work attempts. There is also indication thatclients whose level of functioning is low in some areas can still succeed,as long as they have some compensating strengths. SSA is interested insupporting projects to develop measures of motivation and indices for evaluatingthe strengths and weaknesses of retarded trainees in terms of functionalcapacities to perform employment. The role of family support and encouragementor similar support from elsewhere in the community, as a factor in motivationand job success, should be a particular focus of interest. The measuresshould be applicable to persons with low levels of ability and multiplesevere impairments, and avoid use of implicit screening methods which couldweaken the validity and usefulness of results on explicit screening methods.Rigorous techniques should be used in studying complex issues like motivationand indices of abilities. Tests of the applicability of measures to SSAbeneficiaries are essential (research).<T3>4.5 Types of Jobs Suitable for Mentally Retarded Beneficiaries. </T3>Atpresent, employment programs serving the retarded place a large percentageof clients in food service and custodial occupations. This appears dueto the greater accessibility of such jobs for job development and placement.In fact, jobs in light industry, such as benchwork jobs, are frequentlysimpler and more routine, and might be more suitable for certain mentallyretarded persons. SSA is interested in information on the characteristicsof types of jobs that are suitable for persons with particular intellectualdeficiencies. Demonstrations of employmernt in which production takes placeat smaller scale might produce the opportunity to develop information onlight industry jobs suitable for the mentally retarded. These demonstrationsmust target the SSA beneficiary population and must provide detailed informationon employment outcomes.<T3>4.6 VR Referral and Tracking Systems.</T3> SSA is interested in improvingthe currrent referral of disability applicants to State VRAs through moreeffective follow-up activity. Currently, DDSs refer a small percentageof recently allowed claims to the State VRAs.Some beneficiaries who might benefit from such VRA evaluations and servicesdo not actively seek VRA aid, nor respond to VRA invitations to assistthem to return to work. This may be due to a lack of understanding of whatis being proposed and/or a fear of losing their benefits. Thus, when administrativefollow-up efforts are made (after the VR referrals) to determine laterbeneficiary rehabilitation status, these efforts may be time consumingand non-productive.Demonstrations should focus on a more efficient and productive type ofreferral and tracking system which would help SSA and DDS administrativestaffs improve referral of beneficiaries to VRA, carry out more productiveadministrative follow-up activities to encourage beneficiaries to applyfor VR services, and track the referred beneficiaries through referral,acceptance of VR services, receipt of services, and return to work.An additional referral issue is when would be the best times for SSA torefer beneficiaries to the State VRAs (or other employment services), andhow many times referrals should be made of the same beneficiaries. Oneconventional wisdom about VR referral is that the earlier the interventionthe better, and that it is critical to intervene before an individual developsa disability mindset, becomes dependent on disability status (e.g., secondarygain) and/or ceases to have marketable skills. However, VRAs have notedthat disability applicants are often not receptive to VR while they areawaiting a disability determination and that, for some impairments, thereare medical reasons to delay VR. Most SSA referrals are currently madeby the State DDSs at the time of the disability decision to allow or denybenefits to applicants. Sometimes the applicants are still too disabledby a recent medical condition to believe VR services could be useful. Demonstrationsare needed of referral systems including early referral at time of applicationand referral at later points in time that would result in more beneficiaryresponse and return to work. However, such demonstrations must be cost-effectiveand not increase administrative workloads of State DDSs (research).<T3>4.7 Potential for Direct Involvement of Beneficiaries in the Selectionof Rehabilitation Providers (e.g., use of vouchers) and in the Design ofTheir VR Programs.</T3> The Act requires that disability applicants bereferred to State VRAs. Moreover, while State VRAs develop an individualizedwritten rehabilitation program for each client accepted for VR services,these programs must meet Rehabilitation Services Administration (RSA) guidelines,and the availability of services offered is sometimes restricted by budgetaryconstraints. Therefore, SSA is interested in demonstrations to measure,within a reasonable range of options, the degree to which client participationin the selection of VR services and VR providers may enhance participationin the VR programs, reduce the duration of the VR program, enhance theeffectiveness of the program, and improve employment placement outcomes.SSA anticipates that projects in this area will include some form of casemanagement involving client participation in planning rehabilitation andemployment program services, selecting appropriate providers of services,and monitoring their own progress. In addition, SSA is particularly interestedin projects using vouchers which include cost-sharing options supportedby SSA, beneficiary co-payments or other funding sources. (Note: Moniesfor cost-sharing must be budgeted. See Part III, Section B, 6h.) The objectiveis to demonstrate ways in which client-directed rehabilitation/employmentprograms can be developed and implemented on a cost-effective basis withreplication potential.<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 5.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">State Vocational Rehabilitation Systems Improvement</ITAG>SSA's principal and long-standing employment service resource has beenthe network of State VRAs and agencies for the blind that are responsiblefor administering State plans for VR under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973(Pub. L. 93-112, as amended). (See Section I, subsection E, ``Background,''2, for description of SSA's program with States). Over the years, theseagencies have helped many beneficiaries return to work, but in recent years,fewer beneficiaries have received State VR services. Additionally the mostrecent report on State agency rehabilitations (RSA-300, 1985) shows thatless than half of all DI/SSI disabled and blind beneficiaries reportedas rehabilitated were in the competitive labor market. SSA is interestedin<T3> innovative</T3> State VA/employment agency demonstrations leadingto successful job placement which specialize in the following areas:5.1 linkages with employers and private sector employment resources; 5.2 creative cost-containment approaches that will reduce average costsof rehabilitation/job placement; 5.3 new measures of successful rehabilitation that are predictive of sustainedcompetitive employment to replace the current standard (9 months of SGA);5.4 new structural approaches to assign State VRA staff to specialize inbeneficiary rehabilitation and employment which result in more beneficiariesbeing served and returned to SGA at reasonable costs. Such approaches mustlead to measurable and significant increases in employment placement ofSSA beneficiaries, be replicable on a national basis, and be highly cost-effective.Approaches which merely assign staff to work with SSA beneficiaries arenot being sought. The demonstrations of interest to SSA involve changesin the structural approach within the VRA related to serving SSA beneficiaries.These changes must result in significantly more beneficiaries returningto work and must be capable of continuing without support from SSA; and5.5 innovative use of technology which permits impaired persons to workand/or directly ameliorate and/or improve their impairment(s) to improvefunctional capacity to work. <ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 6.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Application of New Technologies To Assist Return to Employment </ITAG>Advances in technology offer opportunities for disability beneficiariesboth as consumers and producers. Significant advances are continuing tobe made in the development and refinement of new technologies for reducingimpairments and overcoming the handicapping effects of impairments. Thesedevelopments and refinements, which are not always known and accessibleto beneficiaries, make it possible for more disabled persons to returnto work. Additionally, some companies that market new technology to andfor disabled persons have found that it can be very cost-effective to employdisabled persons in the delivery of services to other disabled persons.And, in many areas of high technology production in general, companieshave found that persons with certain disabilities are particularly suitablefor employment. 6.1 <T3>Rehabilitation Engineering and Other Forms of Technological Assistance.</T3>The Rehabilitation Amendments of 1986 (P.L. 99-506) raised the nationalpriority of rehabilitation engineering, which the amendments define as``systematic application of technologies, engineering methodologies orscientific principles to meet the needs of individuals with handicaps inareas including education, rehabilitation, employment, transportation,independent living and recreation.'' Rehabilitation engineering itselfusually only extends the functional capabilities of the handicapped. Itoffers its greatest potential when it is combined with other support services,such as VR and employment services, in a concerted effort to help the disabledreturn to work. SSA is interested in projects which use rehabilitationengineering technologies in conjunction with employment services to assistpersons to return to work, and projects which link beneficiaries needingtechnological intervention in order to return to work to sources of theseservices. SSA is particularly interested in projects which can link beneficiariesto both rehabilitation engineering technology <T3>and</T3> employment services resulting in return to work. Such projectsshould be cost-effective, permit the use of multiple resources combinedwith SSA payment for services, and be replicable. In designing such projects,attention should be given to mechanisms that would permit SSA to rapidlyrefer beneficiaries to appropriate engineering technology <T3>and</T3> employment services. 6.2 <T3>Enhanced Access to Providers of Rehabilitation Engineering.</T3> Thereis a need to expand the opportunities for disability beneficiaries to accessnew technologies, particularly technologies that are marketed to disabledpersons. We are particularly interested in projects that provide improvedmethods for beneficiaries to gain access to new technologies, or projectswhich provide beneficiaries with access to networks which use technologyto develop employment. SSA is seeking to link these networks and/or programswith beneficiaries. Priority Area 7.0:<ITAG tagnum="14">Communication and Marketing of Work Incentives, Vocational Rehabilitation,and Employment Information to Directly Assist Beneficiaries in Returningto work</ITAG>The Social Security Disability Amendments of 1980 liberalized existingWI with the introduction of multiple new provisions (see I-E-3). However,to a large degree, these WI have not been used by beneficiaries, raisingthe question of how effectively they have been communicated. Recent amendmentsadded new incentives (see I-E-3). The problem of lack of awareness and/orunderstanding of WI exists despite legislative initiatives, SSA informationinitiatives, recent changes in attitudes toward the disabled, advancesin medical care, and wider availability of rehabilitation and employmentservices.We know that the success of program WI in large part depends on:andbullet; the beneficiary population's awareness of their rights, obligationsand opportunities under the law;andbullet; the knowledge of SSA's field staff about WI to respond to claimantinquiries accurately and timely; and andbullet; the knowledge and relationships between SSA and disability organizations,public and private VR/employment agencies, job placement programs, physicians,employers, insurers and others.There is a need to develop new, more effective marketing strategies andmaterials which would encourage greater use of the incentives by SSA'sdisabled populations.Since treating physicians, insurers, State VRAs, private VRs, and employersshare in SSA's goal of returning disabled beneficiaries to economic self-sufficiency,we seek their involvement in program promotion and delivery. SSA believesthat these organizations can interrelate much more closely by sharing informationand expediting return-to-work efforts for beneficiaries. But for this tooccur, systematic and ongoing linkage procedures must be developed.The need is to accommodate, encourage and support increased beneficiaryinterest in using the WI, expedite linking beneficiaries with appropriateservice providers, and provide follow-up services for beneficiaries whobecome involved in work activity. Through increased awareness of the WI,and direct linkages to VR/employment service providers, we seek to developimproved attitudes towards SSA as a helping and nonadversarial agency,increase inquiries at FOs about the use of WI, and increase referrals toemployment service providers.A comprehensive, integrated communications and service approach is necessaryto encourage larger numbers of DI and SSI beneficiaries to return to workand, ultimately, achieve independent status through productive employment.This approach will require clear communication, timely referral to serviceproviders, and effective, efficient placement methods. The WI must be clearlypresented to beneficiaries, advocates, physicians, insurers, employersand others as an important part of the DI and SSI programs.Through the establishment of systematic SSA-VR/employment agency linkages,many more beneficiaries will be assisted in returning to employment andregaining their economic independence and self-esteem.SSA is particularly interested in projects which:7.1 examine comprehensive integrated communications approaches that willchange knowledge and behaviors of disabled beneficiaries in order to increasetheir understanding and use of the WI;7.2 improve the knowledge and awareness of WI by VR and employment serviceproviders, physicians, insurers, and employers;7.3 create information exchange relationships between SSA, beneficiariesand service providers to encourge return-to-work;7.4 increase the knowledge of the SSI program, particularly the basic rulesfor treating income and resources and how these are modified by the WIprovisions (1619 (a) and (b), PASS, IRWE and BWE) among VR/employment agencies,insurers, rehabilitation organizations, social workers, counselors, andother professionals in the rehabilitation field; and 7.5 create and test direct linkages between SSA FOs and VR/employment providerswhich are effective in assisting beneficiaries to receive services andreturn to work.Projects in these subpriority areas must be highly cost-effective, replicableand involve appropriate evaluation and measurement techniques to assurethat the tests effectively increase knowledge, affect beneficiary behaviorand <T3>measurably</T3> improve linkages between SSA, beneficiaries and VR/employmentservice providers.<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 8.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Development of State-of-the-Art Information on the Functional Capacityand Compatible Occupations for Persons With Various Impairments</ITAG>While many beneficiaries have impairments which make them unable to performany work-related activities, others have impairments which leave them withthe physical and/or mental capacity to perform some forms of work. Forexample, an individual suffering from epilepsy is often precluded fromperforming work around dangerous machinery or at heights but may not beprevented from performing a job in an office setting. Accurate assessmentof remaining functional capacity despite impairment is a distinct challengeto providers of health care, DI, and VR.<T3>8.1 Measurement of Functional Capacity for Work Performance. </T3>SSAis interested in projects which provide state-of-the-art information onthe functional capacity of persons with various impairments. Measures andvariables need to be defined which can, in a valid and reliable manner,provide accurate estimation of capacity for performance of work-relatedfunctions. A project which develops indices of functional capacity forspecific health conditions, such as musculoskeletal and neurological impairments,would be of particular interest to SSA. In such projects, specific measuresand variables must be defined, tested, and validated with disability beneficiariesand the measures must specifically focus on functional capacity for work.Empirical validation of measures is therefore necessary. New prototypesfor measuring functional capacity of persons with specific impairmentswill be considered so long as the measurements involve assessing capacityfor performing work. In developing measurement instruments, SSA will providesupport only for instruments which could be used on an industry-wide basis(research).<T3>8.2 Functional Capacity for Particular Occupations. </T3>Currently,the <T3>Dictionary of Occupational Titles </T3>and the <T3>Selected Characteristics of Occupations </T3>are the primary sourcesof information which assist in the determination of which occupations arecompatible with the remaining functional capacity of individuals with disabilities.However, no compendium of regular and modified jobs that have been successfullyperformed by persons with specific types and degrees of losses of functionhas been compiled. Having such information available when first encounteringan impaired individual, employment and VR counselors could begin earlyefforts on appropriate educational programs or vocational skill trainingthat may be needed in assisting beneficiaries to return to work.  SSA is interested in projects which develop a compendium of informationidentifying various body systems and impairments, including common functionallimitations imposed by such impairments, and specific jobs or occupationswhich might be performed within those limitations. Such a compendium shouldbe based on empirical information as to the functional limitations associatedwith certain impairments and the specific types of occupations and jobsbeing performed by persons with such impairments. SSA is particularly interestedin focusing on such impairment categories as cardiovascular, musculoskeletal,and mental, although other categories will be considered as well. The developmentand testing of prototype systems is feasible in this subpriority area (research).<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 9.0:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Improved Interagency Record Matching</ITAG>For many years, SSA has provided beneficiary information via computer filesto State agencies to assist in accurately administering various State programs.These data files permit States to employ computer matching and thus arecost-effective in permitting efficient administration of State programs.Also, SSA has sponsored tests of automated matching of beneficiary datato facilitate VR service provision. However, not all data files that theState/local governments maintain are compatible with other State and Federaldata files. These differences in systems often preclude effective inter/intra-State/Federalmatching. There are a variety of voluntary organizations that have excellent knowledgeof the working of Federal, State and local programs which SSA believescould assist in coordination and development of interagency data linkages.<T3>9.1 Computerized Data Matching Systems.</T3> SAA is interested in supportingprojects with States and voluntary agencies that involve the developmentof computerized record systems (for such records as marriage, divorce,etc.) using established standardized formats which can match Federal, State,and voluntary agency records to assist in providing accurate benefits,and increase efficiency in providing rehabilitation services. Such projectsmust clearly identify the specific data systems to be used, their potentialfor matching State/Federal records, the specific outcomes to be achievedand the methods for providing an empirical test of the system(s). <ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 10.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Special Studies </ITAG>SSA has identified a number of special study priorities related to increasingemployment opportunities for beneficiaries. SSA is interested in supportingstudies in the following areas: <T3>10.1 Health Insurance Coverage of Disability Beneficiaries.</T3> Organizationsattempting to help beneficiaries return to work have expressed concernabout health insurance coverage gaps (actual or anticipated) that may causebeneficiaries to delay or avoid rehabilitation and employment. SSA is interestedin studies using available microdata which examine health insurance coverageof disability beneficiaries (and families) and health insurance availablein connection with employment of beneficiaries, the timing and availabilityof such coverage, limitations on coverage, and exclusions preventing coverage.In general, SSA is seeking to learn what medical benefit coverage is availablefor DI/SSI beneficiaries (especially coverage available for beneficiarieswho return to work), the extent of such coverage, gaps in coverage, andwhen these gaps occur. It is not expected that projects will propose newdata collection but rather that existing data will be used to provide informationabout the medical benefit coverage of DI/SSI beneficiaries. Applicantsshould clearly identify the data sources to be used in such analyses, thespecific data items to be analyzed, the extent and limitations of the proposedanalyses, and the specific questions that will be answered by the analysesproposed (research). <T3>10.2 Profile Data and Information on Employment Placement Success WithDisability Beneficiaries.</T3> SSA is interested in developing profiledata on factors which are associated with successful employment placementsfor various categories of disability beneficiaries. The grantee must provideSSA with specific profiles of disability beneficiaries who return to work,based on analysis of data on the demographic, economic, social, healthand psychological characteristics of beneficiaries. Use of secondary datasources is anticipated. Profiles should be validated based on actual dataand returned to work by beneficiaries. Profiles should clearly identifythe key variables associated with employment outcomes. Profile developmentcannot be based on case histories but case histories can be used to furtherexplain or emphasize profile data. The objective is to develop profileinformation on key beneficiary characteristics associated with employmentsuccess. Projects must demonstrate the use of this information in referringindividuals for employment services. <T3>10.3 Employment Services and Rehabilitation Needs of Persons no LongerSufficiently Disabled to Qualify for Disability Benefits.</T3> SAA is interestedin supporting demonstrations that will increase rehabilitation and employmentopportunities for persons leaving the disability rolls due to medical improvement.Demonstrations must target on beneficiaries who are leaving the SSA disabilityprogram because of medical improvement, must specifically provide employmentplacement services which are highly cost-effective and which can be replicatedon a national basis. Proposals must clearly present a systematic methodof identifying appropriate beneficiaries, assure their actual need forplacement services, present a rapid approach for planning and deliveringsuch services, assuring a job placement outcome and closely monitoringcosts. Proposals must include an objective evaluation design which willmeasure the efficiency, effectiveness, and cost-benefit ratio of the techniquesused when integrated with disability program operations.<T3>10.4 Traumatic Brain Injury (TBI) Studies. </T3>Head trauma, primarily(but not exclusively) due to accidents, has become an important publichealth problem. There are many individuals who, because of TBI, apply fordisability benefits. Some of them qualify because of the neurological componentsof the injury and others because of mental components of the injury. Itis estimated that 75 percent of head injuries are of mild to moderate severity.Many of these injuries involve a great deal of brain injury, but to distinguishthem from the category of ``severe'' head injury is not an easy task evenafter all of the information is known. We still do not have full understandingof the components of post-traumatic sequelae of brain injury. SSA believesthat the following issues should be recognized when considering projectsin this area: andbullet; mental impairments tend to be most incapacitating in individualswith mild to moderate head injury, thus, the course of recovery needs tobe assessed in these claimants to determine when their impairments arestable. andbullet; since mental impairments tend to be a frequent cause of disabilityin head injury cases, an assessment should be made of what types of rehabilitationservices, specifically designed for mental impairments, are the most likelyto restore the capacity and motivation to return to work; and andbullet; since a significant number of individuals with TBI do return towork, prognostic factors such as the type of injury, nature of early impairments,etc., should be examined to determine which claimants are the most likelyto respond to rehabilitative intervention.Because the continuum of severity in head injury and its sequelae are notwell understood, this renders medical evaluation of these claimants difficultand makes estimation of functional capacity for purposes of establishingany employable skills particularly hard to accomplish. Therefore, SSA is interested in projects in which TBI data are analyzedto answer such questions as: 1. What percent of mild to moderate head injured individuals return towork?2. Can return to work be predicted by the nature of the injury? (What arethe medical/diagnostic symptoms of injuries over time and how do thesechange in the first year after injury? Does the severity of acute mentalor neurological symptoms correlate with long-term functional capacity?)3. What is the most effective medical intervention for these mild to moderateinjuries? (Does treatment aimed specifically at the mental symptoms (e.g.,cognitive therapy or psychiatric treatment) provide a better rate of returnto work than standard treatment or no treatment?)4. How does work evaluation performance relate to actual return to work?(When some claimants with competitive level skills do not return to work,what is the difference in symptoms, nature of injury or demographic features,etc., between those claimants and the ones who do return to work?)SSA would anticipate use of primary and secondary diagnoses in developinginformation on these questions. Also, SSA will require appropriate scientificdesigns for such projects to assure that data and analyses produced arevalid and reliable (research).<T3>10.5 Support Needed to Continue Employment. </T3>SSA recognizes thatmany beneficiaries who return to work after extended periods of absencefrom the workforce due to disability, need help and encouragement to enablethem to remain at work. SSA is interested in proposals for effective follow-upservices for disabled beneficiaries who return to work and need supportto assist them to retain their employment, or, if they fail on an initialreturn to work, services designed to help them to succeed at another workopportunity. SSA is seeking innovative projects designed to assist disabled beneficiarieswho are placed in employment to remain employed for significant periodsor, if employment ends, to secure another job without delay. Such projectsmight involve specialized follow-up services (only where required) to assurecontinuation of employment, provide information on available WI, and resolveemployment-related problems. Such services would have to be targeted onemployed beneficiaries and be highly efficient and cost-effective. SSAis not interested in projects which simply follow-up beneficiaries whoare placed in employment. The demonstrations we are seeking must focuson providing services which are essential so that beneficiaries continueemployment or rapidly locate new employment.SSA anticipates that projects in this subpriority area will be targetedon special populations of beneficiaries who require follow-up servicesin order to retain employment or locate new employment. Through such demonstrations,SSA is seeking to learn about the types of beneficiaries who require jobretention services, the essential services needed, and their costs. Theseprojects must be based on tests with employed disabled beneficiaries andinvolve empirical data collection and appropriate data analysis to ascertainthe effects of the demonstrated interventions. <T3>10.6 Measurements of Fatigue in Individuals with Multiple Sclerosis(MS).</T3>Fatigue is among the most common and debilitating symptoms of MS. Manypeople with MS have significant disabilities resulting at least in partfrom fatigue-related dysfunction, yet it is a symptom that has proven difficultto measure. SSA would support an effort to develop a set of objective tests for measuringfatigue in beneficiaries impaired by MS. The effort might include developmentof some psychological test instruments, functional tests, tests of performancedecline in the fatigued state and development of criteria correlated withfatigue. The latter might be based on preliminary evidence suggesting acorrelation between the extent of lesions on magnetic resonance imagingand fatigue or on evidence of increased energy expenditure in certain tasks.A modest effort to document functional failure using simple clinical testsbefore and after exercise might also prove useful. Exploration of changesin delay (evoked potentials) or in the amplitude of cortically-evoked responseswith fatigue could lead to the development of more objective criteria forfunctional failure with fatigue. Some MS-impaired individuals may also have difficulty with mental taskswhen fatigued even though they may function very well when rested. Documentationin this area may be difficult but testing mental functioning in the fatiguedstate might prove useful. A thoughtful selection of those mental subtestswhere the performance of MS-impaired beneficiaries is reduced with fatiquemight lead to development of criteria for mental performance at variouslevels of fatigue. A comparison of tests of mental performance in the restedand fatigued state, adjusted for practice effects, might provide usefulnew information (research).<ITAG tagnum="16">Priority Area 11.0: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">Nonpriority Area Projects</ITAG>Applicants may also submit applications for funding in areas not specificallyidentified in this announcement but which are relevant to the goals andobjectives of the disability program. These applications will be designatedas ``nonpriority'' but also will be competitively evaluated by independentreviewers with other ``nonpriority'' applications. A limited number ofprojects may be funded depending upon available funds.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section III_Application Process</ITAG>A. Eligible ApplicantsAny State or local government and public or private organization or agencymay apply for a grant under this announcement. (Individuals are not eligibleto apply.) For-profit organizations may apply with the understanding thatno grant funds may be paid as profit to any grant recipient. Profit isconsidered as any amount in excess of the allowable costs of the grantrecipient.B. Availability and Duration of FundingFederal grant funds may be requested for reimbursement of allowable costsincurred by applicants in conducting the demonstration. These funds, however,are not intended to cover costs that are reimbursable under an existingpublic or private program. We generally expect, under this announcement,to fund the initial 12-month budget period of demonstrations designed tobe completed in 12 to 24 months. Awards for the continuation of selectedprojects will be based on acceptable performance, availability of funds,and assessment of the continuing relevance of the demonstration or researcheffort. In general, we anticipate funding projects that cost a total ofbetween $100,000 and $200,000 per year. Actual awards may vary and eligibleapplicants may request smaller or larger awards.C. Grantee Share of the Project CostsGrant recipients are expected to contribute towards the cost of each project.SSA does not make grant awards for the total cost of the projects. Successfulapplicants for <T3>demonstration grants</T3> are eligible to receive 3 dollars in Federalfunding for each 1 dollar secured from non-Federal sources, up to the limitsspecified in the priority area descriptions in this announcement.Therefore, at least 25 percent of the total costs for demonstration projectsmust come from a source other than the Federal Government (1 DOLLAR MATCHFOR EVERY 3 DOLLARS REQUESTED FROM SSA). HOWEVER, FOR APPLICANTS SUBMITTING<T3>RESEARCH</T3> PROPOSALS, A 5-PERCENT (MINIMUM) MATCH IS REQUIRED.D. Availability of FormsAll instructions and forms required for submittal of applications are includedin this announcement. Additional copies of this announcement may be obtainedby writing or telephoning the Grants Management Staff, Division of Contractand Grant Operations OAG, DCM, Social Security Administration: 1-E-4 GwynnOak Building, 1710 Gwynn Oak Avenue, Baltimore, Maryland 21241, Attention:SSA RDP-2, Telephone: (301) 965-9500.E. Application Submission<T3>An original and a minimum of two signed copies of the application mustbe submitted to the above address. </T3>Submittal of <T3>six additional copies is optional and will expedite processing. However,there is no penalty for not submitting the additional copies.</T3>F. Application Consideration All applications requesting Federal grant funds must be submitted on thestandard forms provided in this announcement. The application shall beexecuted by an individual authorized to act for the applicant organizationand to assume for the applicant organization the obligations imposed bythe terms and conditions of a grant award. Applications that conform to the requirements of this program announcementwill be reviewed and scored by independent reviewers against the evaluationcriteria specified in Section III, H.2 of this announcement. Although theresults of this review are a primary factor considered in making the decisionabout an application, review scores are not the only factor. SSA reserves the option of discussing applications with, or referring themto, other Federal or non-Federal funding sources when it is determinedto be in the best interest of the Federal government or the applicant.G. Special Considerations for Funding Within the limits of available Federal funds, SSA will make financial assistanceawards consistent with the statutory authorities governing the SSP RDPand this announcement. In making these decisions, preference may be givento applications which feature: a substantial innovation that has the potentialto improve practice in the VR/employment of persons on SSA's disabilityrolls; a model practice or set of procedures that hold the potential fordissemination to, and utilization by organizations involved in the administrationor delivery of rehabilitation services; and, substantial involvement (eitherfinancial or programmatic) of the private sector and the possibility ofa large degree of benefit for a small Federal investment. SSA will alsotake into account the need to avoid duplication of effort in making fundingdecisions. H. Criteria for Screening and Review All applications that meet the deadline will be screened to determine completenessand conformity to the requirements of this announcement. Complete, comformingapplications will then be reviewed and evaluated. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Screening Requirements </ITAG>In order for an application to be in conformance, it must meet all of thefollowing requirements: (a) Number of copies: An original and two signed copies of the application<T3>must</T3> be submitted. Six <T3>additional</T3> copies are optional but will expedite processing. (b) Length: The program narrative portion of the application MUST NOT EXCEED25 DOUBLE-SPACED PAGES (or 13 single-spaced pages) typewritten on one sideof the paper only. (c) Selection of priority area: In item 7 of the Face Sheet (SF-424), indicateone subpriority area only for which the application is being submitted,(e.g., 4.3, 7.1, 7.2, etc.). If not submitted in response to any of thesubpriority areas specified by this announcement, indicate ``nonpriority.''<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Evaluation Criteria </ITAG>Applications which pass the screening will be reviewed by at least threeindividuals. Reviewers will score the applications, basing their scoringdecisions on the following criteria: (a) <T3>Project Objectives: 5 points.</T3> The application details the specificobjectives of the project. How closely do the project's objectives fitthe objectives of the subpriority area under which the application is submitted?For nonpriority projects, how well do the objectives of the project fitthe goals and objectives of the announcement? (b) <T3>Background/Importance of Project: 10 points.</T3> The application clearlydescribes the problem, issue or situation that prompts the applicant'sproposal. The need for the project is discussed in terms of local, regionalor national significance and the importance of the issues to be addressed.It also summarizes the state-of-the-art in resolving these problems, includinghow this project builds upon previous work, how it advances the state ofknowledge from a national perspective, and how it addresses a priorityneed identified in this announcement (or in the case of a ``nonpriority''project, how it addresses the goals and objectives of this announcement).Where appropriate, attention is paid to the larger significance (regional,national) of the project, beyond its actual implementation site(s). (c) <T3>Project Methodology: 35 points.</T3> 1. List the concepts to be tested.Make them clearly relate to the objectives of the priority area(s) chosen.For example, in priority area 3, it is stated that the project must bedesigned to return disability beneficiaries to SGA. Therefore, the basicconcept should be that the procedure you are demonstrating will returnmore beneficiaries to SGA. 2. Describe how you plan to conduct your test(s). Provide a detailed descriptionof the methods and procedures you plan to use and indicate <T3>how you plan to measure</T3> the effects of your test(s) relative tosome benchmark, e.g., how many more of your test subjects achieve SGA ascompared with your estimate of the number you would expect under the currentSSA disability programs. 3. Indicate the size of your sample and describe how you arrived at yoursample size in light of the test(s) you intend to conduct and the designconsiderations of your demonstration. For example, a demonstration withchronic brain damaged beneficiaries in a medium-size metropolitan areamay be difficult, given the small numbers of such beneficiaries who mayreside within that area. Your proposal should give assurances that youhave determined that a sufficient number of subjects reside in the geographicarea of the demonstration site to permit an adequate sample size. 4. Explain how you propose to select your sample. Describe the processof acquiring eligible subjects. Describe any incentives used to encouragesubjects to participate. 5. It is probable that an observation period which is longer than the treatmentperiod will be required for your tests. Discuss the length of the treatmentand observation periods and describe how the length of your observationperiod will be sufficient to gather the necessary data. Describe how contactwill be made for gathering data during the observation period, e.g., mailcontact, phone contact, personal contact, employer follow-up, etc.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> In some instances, primarily with the larger demonstrations,it may be possible to construct a <T3>statistically valid experimental design.</T3> In those instances, afull project protocol should be provided, including a statement of hypothesesto be tested, a detailed explanation of the methodology to be used (natureof statistical tests and methods, etc.), a description of the sample designand explanation of how the sample design is suited to the statistical methodologyand hypotheses to be tested, rationale for specification of sample size,and an estimate with explanation of the statistical power of the testsresulting from all of the above. In such designs, the use of an appropriate,randomly-selected control group is highly desirable.</ITAG>6. List the data to be collected. Discuss how the data will be used inthe analysis. Discuss the data that will be supplied for further evaluationby SSA. Describe the evaluation approach to be used indicating the typesof outcome information expected.7. Discuss potential problems that may arise and how they will be resolved,e.g., describe how dropouts, inadequate number of referrals, etc., willbe handled.8. Greater consideration will be given to proposals which meet the followingcriteria:andbullet; where the size and scope of the proposed demonstration dictatea statistically valid experimental design, and provision is made for theestablishment of a control group of individuals with similar characteristicsto the participants receiving the treatment (SSA prefers that the projectparticipants be identified prior to the start of the treatment so thatthe participants may be randomly assigned between the treatment and controlgroups);andbullet; plans to provide SSA with project data on both the treatment (andcontrol group where appropriate), on an ongoing basis, so that SSA maycontinue an evaluation after that performed by the grantee. It is recommendedthat the data for each participant include, but need not be limited to,the following:a. Educationb. Date of birthc. Prior occupationd. Sex e. Type of disabilityf. The following datesandbullet; start of treatmentandbullet; start of each job and type of jobandbullet; end of each jobandbullet; date of completion of TWPandbullet; date of terminationandbullet; deathandbullet; withdrawal from studyandbullet; medical terminationg. Income from all sources (e.g., other disability income, monthly earningson jobs, spousal earnings)andbullet; plans to provide SSA with information to enable it to follow projectparticipants for a period sufficient to observe whether work attempts aresustained and terminations from the DI and/or SSI program result; andandbullet; for projects designed to provide SSA with data, information, orinvolving a test of a particular system, methodology or measurement scale,the evaluation plan specifies how the particular products being developedin the project will be reviewed and provides SSA with sufficient detailsto assure that the products will be thoroughly evaluated.(d) <T3>Work Plan: 20 points. </T3>The application provides specific plansfor conducting the project in terms of the tasks to be performed. It includesrelevant information about: (1) The tasks to be completed in the project,(2) a chart with tasks laid out over time (Gantt chart), (3) a clear descriptionof how much time and how many staff will be needed to complete each task,(4) the products to be developed over the course of the project, and (5)if an independent contractor is to be used for any part of the project,include the scope of work to be performed by such contractor, the tasksto be completed, a time chart for such tasks and the products to be providedby the sub-contractor.(e) <T3>Organizational Capability: 10 points. </T3>The resources that willbe needed to conduct the project are specified including personnel, time,funds and facilities (including computer capability and specialized technicalequipment, where relevant). These resources should be adequate to accomplishthe work plan described in the application. The staff (or other personnelresources) should be qualified and possess the variety of skills and abilitiesrequired to produce final results that are readily comprehensible and usable.The qualifications of top staff who would have little or no direct impacton the project would not be relevant. The staffing pattern clearly linksresponsibilities to project tasks. The total cost of the project is reasonablein view of the anticipated results. Any collaborative effort with otheragencies or organizations is clearly identified, and written assurancesreferenced. A description by category (personnel, travel, etc.) of totalfunds required and of the sources of outside support that will be usedto meet the matching requirement is included. The funds (total of Federalfunds and non-Federal funds) are specified. The location and adequacy ofthe facilities are provided.(f) <T3>Implementation Potential: 15 points. </T3>The application addressesthe costs and benefits that might accrue from replication of the projectresults. Discussion is included of special features of the target group(s)for which this proposal is designed, how final products will facilitateutilization of project findings, and plans to continue the project or implementits findings after completion.(g) <T3>Dissemination of Results: 5 points. </T3>The proposed project specifiesthe means to be used to disseminate results and promote utilization ofthese results by others in the field. If applicable, specific trainingmethods, training materials and target audiences to which methods and materialswould be addressed should be identified.THESE EVALUATION CRITERIA CORRESPOND TO THE OUTLINE FOR THE NARRATIVE SECTIONOF THE APPLICATION. THE DESCRIPTIONS OF THE SEVEN CRITERIA ABOVE SHOULDBE USED IN DEVELOPING THE PROGRAM NARRATIVE. ALSO REFER TO THE OUTLINEIN SECTION IV.I. Closing Date for Receipt of ApplicationsThe closing date for submittal of applications under this announcementis <T3>June 30, 1988. </T3>Applications must be mailed or hand-delivered to:Grants Management Staff, Division of Contract and Grant Operations, OAG,DCM, Social Security Administration, 1-E-4, Gwynn Oak Building, 1710 GwynnOak Avenue, Baltimore, Maryland 21241, Attention: SSA RDP-2, SubpriorityArea: <T2>XXXXXX</T2>Hand-delivered applications are accepted during the hours of 8:00 a.m.to 5:00 p.m., Monday through Friday. An application will be consideredas meeting the deadline if it is either:1. received on or before the deadline date at the above address; or2. mailed through the United States Postal Service or sent by commercialcarrier on or before the deadline date and received in time to be consideredduring the competitive review and evaluation process. Applicants are cautionedto request a legibly dated U.S. Postal Service postmark or to obtain alegibly dated receipt from a commercial carrier as evidence of timely filing.Private metered postmarks are not acceptable as proof of timely mailing.Applications which do not meet the above criteria are considered late applications.SSA will notify each late applicant that its application will not be consideredin the current competition.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>This notice contains reporting requirements in ``The Application Process''section. However, the information is collected using Form SSA-96, FederalAssistance, which has OMB clearance number 0960-0184.<ITAG tagnum="85">Executive Order 12372_Intergovernmental Review of Federal Programs</ITAG>This program is not covered by the requirements of Executive Order 12372relating to the Federal policy for consulting with State and local electedofficials on proposed Federal financial assistance.<ITAG tagnum="20">Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program (CFDA) No. 13.812_AssistancePayments_Research and Demonstrations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David A. Rust,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Associate Commissioner for Disability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Rhoda Davis,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Associate Commissioner for Supplemental Security Income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis D. Enoff,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Deputy Commissioner for Programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: April 29, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Dorcas R. Hardy,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Social Security.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Section IV_Instructions for Completing Applications</ITAG>A. ApplicationPackageIn order to expedite the processing of applications, we request that you<T3>adhere to the following instructions explicitly. </T3>An applicationmay be considered incomplete and returned if it fails to follow the instructionsor if the material presented is insufficient to permit an adequate review.andbullet; Type the application using standard-size type.andbullet; Type on one side only.andbullet; Reproduced copies should be single-sided.andbullet; Do not bind or staple the applications. Secure them with rubberbands or paper clips.andbullet; If continuation pages are required, please use standard-size (8\1/2\andmin16;andmin16;andmultiply; 11andmin16;andmin16;) white bond paper.andbullet; All items on the forms must be completed. Enter ``NONE'' or ``NA''(not applicable) whenever appropriate.andbullet; Do not use covers, binders or tabs.andbullet; Do not include extraneous materials such as agency promotion brochures,slides, tapes, film clips, etc. It is not feasible to use such items inthe review process, and they will be discarded if included.andbullet; All applicants will be immediately notified of receipt and theidentification number assigned to their application. This number and thesubpriority area must be referred to in <T3>ALL </T3>subsequent communication with SSA concerning the application.If acknowledgement is not received within 30 days after the deadline date,please notify SSA by telephone (301) <T3>965-9500.</T3>andbullet; Applicants should be advised that SSA STAFF CANNOT RELEASE PREDECISIONALINFORMATION relative to an application other than that it has been receivedand that it is going through the review process. Unnecessary inquiriesdelay the award process. Once a decision is reached, the applicant willbe notified as soon as possible of the acceptance or rejection of the application.andbullet; ALL APPLICANTS MUST SUBMIT AN ORIGINAL AND 2 COPIES OF THE COMPLETEDAPPLICATION FORM SSA-96.B. Content of the ApplicationEach copy of the application must contain a FACE SHEET (SF-424), and becompleted and assembled in accordance with the following instructions:1. PART I, FACE SHEET of the application including a project summary description;2. PART II, PROJECT APPROVAL INFORMATION;3. PART III, BUDGET INFORMATION;4. PART IV, PROGRAM NARRATIVE;5. PART V, ASSURANCES; and,6. Projects which require collaboration or substantive commitment by Federal,State, or local governments or organizations other than the applicant'sorganization should (if possible) include letters of cooperation. Theseletters are not part of the narrative and, therefore, are not counted againstthe 25-page limit for the narrative.C. Preparing the Application<ITAG tagnum="81">Part I_Face Sheet (SF-424)</ITAG>The following instructions are provided for completing Sections I and II:<T3>Item 1. </T3>Not applicable.<T3>Item 2a. </T3>Applicant's own control number, if desired.<T3>Item 2b. </T3>Date SECTION I is prepared (at applicant's option).<T3>Item 3a. </T3>Not applicable.<T3>Item 3b. </T3>Not applicable.<T3>Items 4a. </T3>Legal name of applicant, name of primary<T3>Thru 4h. </T3>organizational unit which will undertake the assistanceactivity, complete address of applicant, and name and telephone number(including area code) of the person who can provide further informationabout this request.If the payee will be other than the applicant, enter under SECTION IV_REMARKS,the payee's name, department or division, complete address, and employeridentification or HHS entity number.If the contact person is other than the Project Director, furnish (if known)the Project Director's name, title, and telephone number under SECTIONIV_REMARKS.<T3>Item 5. </T3>Employer Identification Number (EIN) of applicant as assignedby the Internal Revenue Service (IRS).If the applicant has been assigned a Department of Health and Human Services(DHHS) entity number consisting of the IRS employer identification numberprefixed by ``1'' and suffixed by a two-digit code, enter the full DHHSentity number. Otherwise, enter the IRS EIN.<T3>Item 6a. </T3>Use CFDA number 13.812.<T3>Item 6b. </T3>Not applicable.<T3>Item 7. </T3>Select a title that is both short (60 characters or less)and descriptive. Include the subpriority area under which this applicationis submitted. If the application is not submitted in response to any ofthe subpriority areas specified in this announcement, indicate ``nonpriority.''Project Summary Description. Item 7 also asks for a summary descriptionof the project using Section IV of SF-424. In place of Section IV, attacha separate sheet of 8\1/2\ x 11&quot; plain paper to provide this summary descriptionof the project. Clearly mark this separate page with the applicant nameas shown in item 4a. and the subpriority areas as shown in item 7. Thesummary description should not exceed 1,200 characters, including words,spaces and punctuation. These 1,200 characters become part of the computerdatabase on each project.The description should be specific and concise. It should describe theobjectives of the project, the approaches to be used and the outcomes expected.At the end of the summary, list major products that will result from theproposed project (such as software packages, materials, management procedures,data collection instruments, training packages or videos) and any restrictionsor limitations on its use by SSA. Remember this summary description islimited to 1,200 characters. This information, in conjunction with theinformation on the Face Sheet (SF-424), becomes the project's ``abstract'',and will be the major source of information about the project.<T3>Item 8.</T3>``City'' includes town, township and other municipality.<T3>Item 9. </T3>List only largest unit or units affected, such as State,county, or city.<T3>Item 10. </T3>Estimated number of persons directly benefiting fromproject.<T3>Item 11. </T3>Not applicable.<T3>Item 12. </T3>Amount requested or to be contributed during the firstfunding/budget period by each contributor. Value of in-kind contributionsshould be included.<T3>Item 12a. </T3>Amount requested from the Federal government.<T3>Item 12b. </T3>Amount applicant will contribute.<T3>Item 12c. </T3>Amount from State, if applicant is not a State.<T3>Item 12d. </T3>Amount from local government, if applicant is not alocal government.<T3>Item 12e. </T3>Amount from any other sources. Explain in SECTION IV.<T3>Item 12f. </T3>Total of lines 12a through 12e.<T3>Item 13a. </T3>Congressional district of the applicant.<T3>Item 13b. </T3>The district(s) where most of the action work will beaccomplished. If city-wide or State-wide covering several districts, write``city-wide'' or ``State-wide.''<T3>Item 14. </T3>Not applicable.<T3>Item 15. </T3>Approximate date project expected to begin.<T3>Item 16. </T3>Estimated number of months to complete project afterFederal funds are available. <T3>Item 17 thru 20. </T3>Not applicable. <T3>Item 21. </T3>Check appropriate box as to whether SECTION IV of formcontains remarks and/or additional remarks are attached. <T3>Item 22a. </T3>Not applicable. <T3>Item 22b. </T3>Not applicable. <T3>Item 23a. </T3>Name and title of authorized representative of legalapplicant. <T3>Item 23b. </T3>To be valid and acceptable for review, an applicationmust be properly executed by an individual authorized to act for the applicantorganization and to assume the obligations imposed by the requirementsand conditions for any grant award including the applicable Federal regulations.If the authorized official is not available, an individual authorized toact on his/her behalf may sign as ``acting for'' the designated official.<ITAG tagnum="81">Part II_Project Approval Information</ITAG>Negative answers will not require an explanation. Provide supplementarydata for all ``Yes'' answers in the space provided in accordance with thefollowing instructions:<T3>Item 1. </T3>Provide the name of the governing body establishing thepriority system and the priority rating assigned to this project. <T3>Item 2. </T3>Provide the name of the agency or board which issued theclearance and attach the documentation of status or approval. <T3>Item 3. </T3>Attach the clearinghouse comments for the application.If comments were submitted previously with a preapplication, do not submitthem again but any additional comments received from the clearinghouseshould be submitted with this application. <T3>Item 4. </T3>Furnish the name of the approving agency and the approvaldate. <T3>Item 5. </T3>Show whether the approved comprehensive plan is State,local or regional, or if none of these, explain the scope of the plan.Give the location where the approved plan is available for examinationand state whether this project is in conformance with the plan. <T3>Item 6. </T3>Show the population residing or working on the Federalinstallation who will benefit from this project. <T3>Item 7. </T3>Show the percentage of the project work that will be conductedon Federally-owned or leased land. Give the name of the Federal installationand its location. <T3>Item 8. </T3>Describe briefly the possible beneficial and harmful impacton the environment of the proposed project. If an adverse environmentalimpact is anticipated, explain what action will be taken to minimize theimpact. <T3>Item 9. </T3>State the number of individuals, families, businessesor farms this project will displace. <T3>Item 10. </T3>Show the FDAC number, the program name, the type of assistance,the status and the amount of each project where there is related previous,pending or anticipated assistance. Use additional sheets, if needed<ITAG tagnum="81">Part III_Budget Information. </ITAG>SECTIONS A, B, C, and D should include budget estimates for the first budgetperiod (usually 12 months) and SECTION E should present the need for Federalassistance in the subsequent budget period(s).<T3>Section A_Budget Summary. </T3>Grant applicants requesting assistanceto conduct activities under grant programs administered by SSA are expectedto contribute towards the total cost of the activity. These costs mustbe reflected in the grant application. The budget for the activity mustinclude funds requested from SSA and the applicant's share of allowancecosts.Line 1, Columns a and b_In column a, enter ``SSA'' and in column b, enterthe CFDA number.Leave columns c and d blank. Enter in column e the amount of Federal fundsneeded to support the project for the first funding period (usually 12months). Enter in column f the amount of the cost of the project to beborne by the applicant. Enter in column g the total of columns e and f.Lines 2 through 5, columns a through g of this section are not to be completed.<T3>Section B_Budget Categories. </T3>Use column 1 only. Leave columns2, 3, 4, and 5 blank.Lines 6a-h_Show the estimated Federal costs for each object class categoryin column 1.Line 6a_Personnel. Show salaries and wages only. Fees and expenses forconsultants should be included on line h_Other. In computing estimatedsalary changes, an individual's base salary represents the total authorizedannual compensation that an applicant organization would be prepared topay for a specified work period. The base salary excludes income that anindividual may be permitted to earn outside of full-time duties to theapplicant organization.Line 6b_Fringe Benefits. Fringe benefits may be requested as a direct costto the extent that they are treated consistently by the applicant organizationas a direct cost to all sponsors. As an alternative, fringe benefits maybe included in the calculation of the applicant organization's indirectcosts. If a fringe benefit rate has been negotiated with DHHS or anotherFederal agency, indicate the agency and the applicable rate under SECTIONF. Otherwise, indicate the method used in computing the amount of fringebenefits claimed.Line 6c_Travel. Include the cost of travel for employees only. Travel forconsultants should be included on line 6h_Other. Under SECTION F describethe purpose of any travel, number of trips involved, destinations, individualswho will be traveling and the projected cost per trip, i.e., local transportation,air travel, per diem, etc. Include the computations used in determiningthe cost.Line 6d_Equipment. Include only nonexpendable personal property which hasa useful life of more than 2 years and an acquisition cost of $500 or moreper unit. Under SECTION F, list and explain the need for each item of equipment.Line 6e_Supplies. Include all tangible personal property except that listedon line 6d. If the total exceeds $500, list and explain the need for theitems under SECTION F.Line 6f_Contractual. Include all procurement contracts (except those whichbelong on other lines such as equipment, supplies, consultant services,etc.). List each contract, the amount and purpose under SECTION F.Line 6g_Construction. SSA programs do not have construction authority butmay support limited alteration and renovation costs. Amounts included underthis category must be fully explained under SECTION F.Line 6h_Other. Use for all direct costs not clearly covered by lines athrough g. Examples are computer use charges, consultant costs, equipmentrentals, and voucher cost-sharing monies for proposals submitted undersubpriority area 4.7. Amounts entered under this category must be itemizedand fully explained under SECTION F including the method used in computingthe cost.Line 6i_Total Direct Costs. Enter the total of lines 6a through 6h.Line 6j_Indirect Costs. Applicants which are State and local governments,enter the amount of indirect costs. List and explain these costs underSECTION F. Indicate if the costs are claimed in accordance with an approvedState cost allocation plan.Applicants other than State and local governments, enter the amount ofindirect costs. If the costs are claimed in accordance with an approvedindirect cost rate negotiated with DHHS or another Federal agency, includethe name of the agency and the rate under SECTION F. If a rate has notbeen negotiated, list and explain the costs including the method of computation.Link 6k_Totals. Enter the total of lines 6i and 6j.Line 7_Program Income. Enter the estimated amount of income, if any, expectedto be generated from this project. Do not add or subtract this amount fromthe total project amount. Explain the nature and source of income underSECTION F.Section C_Nonfederal Resources. On line 8, column a, enter SSA. In columnb enter the amount of funds or the value of in-kind contributions to beprovided by the applicant. In column c, enter the amount of State funds.In column d, enter the amount of funds or the value of in-kind contributionsfrom other sources. Enter the totals in column e. Line 12 need not be completed.Section D_Forecasted Cash Needs. Line 13_Enter the amount of Federal fundsneeded by quarter during the first year.Line 14_Enter the amount of funds from all other non-Federal sources neededby quarter during the first year.Line 15_Enter the totals of amounts on lines 13 and 14.Section E_Budget Estimates of Federal Funds Needed for Balance of the Project.Enter in the proper columns the amounts of Federal funds which will beneeded to complete the project over the succeeding funding periods (inyears). Enter the total for each of the future years on line 16k.Section F_Other Budget Information. Attach additional sheets if necessaryin explaining and justifying the items contained in the project budget(SECTION B). The information provided should include sufficient detail(including the method of computation) to facilitate a determination asto the allowability, relevance to the project, and cost/benefit.Section G_Personnel. 1. Personnel. List all personnel chargeable as a directcost to the project by title, salary and percentage of effort. Includenames for key positions only.Enter in column 1 the annual (12 months) salary rate for each positionwhich will be filled for all or any part of the year by an incumbent workingon the project. This rate may not be more than that paid by the granteeto other employees in comparable positions or, if the grantee has no comparablepositions, the rate may not be more than that paid for such services elsewherein the community.Enter in column 2 the number of months the position will be filled by anincumbent working on the project.Enter in column 3 the percent of time or effort the incumbent will devoteto the project during the number of months shown in column 2.Enter in column 4 the total amount required, as computed from the informationshown in columns 1 through 3. Use the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="26">Annual Salary (col. 1) times No. of Months (col. 2) divided by 12times Percent of Effort (col. 3) equals Total Amount Required (col. 4)</ITAG>2. Fringe Benefits. Enter in the parentheses the applicable fringe benefitrate(s). In column 4, enter the amount determined by applying the rateto the total of the salaries in column 4 to which the rate(s) applies.3. Option for Salary Detail Submission. Applicants may request that thesalary rates and amount requested for individuals not be made availableto DHHS reviewing consultants. To do so, an additional copy of this pagemust be submitted, complete in all respects, except that columns 1 and4 may be left blank.4. Function/Task Description. Attach a description of the function or taskto be performed for all personnel listed.<ITAG tagnum="81">Part IV_Program Narrative</ITAG>The review of grant applications is aided materially when project descriptionsare presented in a reasonably uniform pattern. For this reason, the followingguidelines should be used in completing the program narrative. The programnarrative is not to exceed 25 pages typed double-spaced, or 13 pages typedsingle-spaced and should provide information on how the application meetsthe evaluation criteria in Section III. Pages should be typed on one sideonly of standard-sized white bond paper. Each page should be numbered consecutivelyat the bottom beginning with page IV-1.The program narrative should describe the major issues of concern, theresearch and demonstration methodology to be used in addressing these issues,and the potential for implementation of the results. Review of the narrativewill concentrate on the above and on the manageability of the design asreflected in the work plan. Should the proposed project be funded, theinformation provided in the narrative will form the basis for monitoringthe project and evaluating progress for future funding decisions, as wellas aid SSA in planning for required technical assistance and for the implementationand dissemination of project findings.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>A consultant in research design may be useful in preparinga proposal under this announcement. Such a person is knowledgeable aboutthe issues to be addressed in the research and demonstration methodologysection, and may be helpful in developing a work plan as well as disseminatingthe results. Persons trained in research project planning and design maywork in many different occupations and for a wide variety of employers,most notably in the social science department (e.g., Sociology, Economics,Political Science, etc.) of colleges or universities.</ITAG>The narrative should be organized under the following major headings asappropriate:A. Project Title and ObjectivesB. Background and Importance of ProjectC. Research and Demonstration MethodologyD. Work PlanE. Organizational CapacityF. Implementation PotentialG. Dissemination of ResultsThe program narrative should be completed as follows:<T3>A. Project Title and Objectives. </T3>1. Select a title that is bothshort (60 characters or less) and descriptive.2. Specify the objectives of the project.<T3>B. Background and Importance of Project. </T3>1. Discuss the majorareas the project will address and the national significance of these problemareas. Include factual comments on the number of individuals (recipients)affected and the magnitude of the human, physical and fiscal resourcesinvolved.2. Discuss the state-of-the-art in resolving these problems. Include approachesthat have been or are being taken in resolving the problems and the outcomesof these approaches. Also include: (1) The organizational structures whichcurrently deal with the problems, (2) the services provided, and (3) theadministrative methods currently used.3. Discuss the approaches proposed for resolving the problems includedwith this project and the rationale supporting the proposed resolution.4. If the performance of any of the project activities is to be transferredto a third party (e.g., evaluation of the project_see Section IV., D) includethe following information:(a) a description of the activities in question; (b) a justification forthe performance by a third party; (c) estimated costs and time schedule;and (d) a description of the kinds of organizations or other parties tobe selected and the method of selection.5. Summarize important results obtained by others which bear on this project,citing publications where applicable. It should be apparent from the summarythat existing literature has been critically reviewed and that relatedprograms being carried on elsewhere are known to the applicant.6. Cite the most important publications of the project staff on this orclosely related work. If none, list the most important publications inother related fields over the last 5 years.<T3>C. Research and Demonstration Methodology. </T3>1. List the hypothesesto be tested. Make them clearly relate to the objectives of the priorityarea(s) chosen. For example, in priority area 3, it is stated that theproject must be designed to return disability beneficiaries to SGA. Therefore,the basic hypothesis should be that the treatment will return more beneficiariesto SGA.2. Describe how you propose to test your hypotheses. If a comparison ofthe new treatment with the present program is indicated, a treatment andcontrol group structure needs to be established.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>In some instances, a hypothesis testing methodology maynot be appropriate or feasible for projects. In such cases, the researchand demonstration methodology must be explicitly described including adetailed explanation of the methodology to be used for conducting the projectemphasizing the procedures and methods to be used in determining projectimpact.</ITAG>3. Indicate the size of your sample and describe how you arrived at yoursample size in light of the hypotheses to be tested. Explain how the samplesize will be sufficient to detect differences between the treatment andcontrol group in which you are interested, e.g., indicate the statisticalpower of test.4. It is probable that an observation period which is longer than the treatmentperiod will be required to test the hypotheses. Discuss the length of thetreatment and observation periods and describe how the length of your observationperiod will be sufficient to gather the necessary data for your hypothesesto be tested. Describe how contact will be made for gathering data duringthe pre- and post-treatment observation period, e.g., mail contact, phonecontact, personal contact, employer follow-up, etc.5. Explain how you propose to select your sample. Describe the processof acquiring eligible subjects. Describe the process of selecting a controlgroup of subjects identical to the treatment group. Describe any incentivesused to encourage subjects to participate.6. List the data to be collected. Explain how these data will be used totest the hypotheses. Discuss how the data will be used in the analysis.Discuss the data that will be supplied for further evaluation by SSA. Forproject findings that are not suitable for hypothesis testing, describein detail the evaluation approach to be used indicating the type of outcomeinformation expected.7. Discuss potential problems that may arise and how they will be resolved,e.g., describe how dropouts, inadequate number of referrals, etc., willbe handled (see especially Section III, H., 2, (c)).<T3>D. Work Plan. </T3>1. List and describe each task (at lease one paragraphper task) that must be completed to carry out the project. (Most projectsshould have between 10 and 20 tasks.)2. Specify the project(s) for each task that can be provided to SSA onrequest as proof that the task has been completed.3. Prepare a Gantt chart showing the start and end dates for each task.Including milestones such as:andbullet; onsite acquisition of staff;andbullet; physical acquisition of facilities and equipment;andbullet; pretest of measurement devices;andbullet; establishment of linkages with ongoing programs;andbullet; acquisition of subjects for testing;andbullet; signing of agreements and contracts;andbullet; arrangements with public and private agencies to provide services,data or other support;andbullet; steps to involve potential users; and andbullet; completion and dissemination of final report.4. Show the level of effort in work-months (by project personnel, if possible)required to complete each task.5. Indicate the formats for the interim and final progress reports to besubmitted to SSA.6. If an independent sub-contractor is to be used for any part of the project,include the scope of work to be performed by such contractor, the tasksto be completed, a time chart for such tasks, and the products to be providedby the sub-contractor.<T3>E. Organizational Capacity.</T3> Project staff and Facilities1. Include a project staff organization chart and, if applicable, showthe linkages with State/county organization charts. Note that the ProjectDirector should be full-time, if possible or devote a substantial portionof his/her time to the project.2. Staff Qualifications_Include a biographical sketch of the proposed ProjectDirector and other key project staff, highlighting special qualificationsthat relate to the accomplishment of project objectives, such as educationand experience. For each of the key staff not identified at the time ofapplication, provide (in lieu of a biographical sketch) a job description,qualifications sought and a projection of how long after notification ofgrant award the recruitment of these staff will take.3. Discuss other qualifications of staff or of organizations affiliatedwith the project that enhance its potential success.4. Describe the facilities where the activity will be conducted and thelocation (including computer capability and specialized technical equipmentwhere relevant).Organizational Capability Statement. Provide a brief (maximum 2 pages double-spacedor one page single-spaced) background description of how the applicantagency (or the particular division of a larger agency which will have responsibilityfor this project) is organized and the types and quantity of services itprovides or research capabilities it possesses. This description shouldcover capabilities not included in the program narrative under projectstaff and responsibilities. It may include description of any current orprevious relevant experience or describe the competence of the projectteam and its demonstrated ability to produce a final product that is readilycomprehensible and usable.<T3>F. Implementation Potential. </T3>1. Estimate the costs and the benefitsthat might accrue from replication or installation on a State-wide (ornationwide) basis, specifying the assumptions and logic used in makingthe estimate. Provide a description of the specific uses of the projectresults which are directly relevant to the needs of SSA disabled beneficiariesand suggest how the results could be applied to assist beneficiaries.2. Specify any special features of the target group(s) and the operationalenvironment in which the project will operate that would vary in otherlocations, thus influencing utilization potential, e.g., rural population,minority composition, political climate, governmental centralization ordecentralization, etc.3. Specify how final products will be oriented toward facilitating implementationin other locations.4. Discuss commitments made by Federal, State or local governments andother organizations to continue the project or implement its findings aftercompletion.<T3>G. Dissemination of Results. </T3>1. Specify the means to disseminatethe results and promote utilization of these results by others in the field.2. Describe (where appropriate) the training methods and content to bepackaged for dissemination and use for others. Note any restrictions orlimitations (patent, copyright, proprietary interest, etc.) on its useby SSA.<ITAG tagnum="81">Part V_Assurances</ITAG>Applicants are required to file Part V, Assurances, and the Assurance ofCompliance with the DHHS Regulations under Title VI of the Civil RightsAct of 1964 (Form HHS-441). Copies of these assurances are reprinted atthe end of this announcement.<T3>A. Check List of Application Requirements. </T3>Before submitting theapplication for grant support, check to assure that the following itemsare included:Formal application prepared on Form SSA-96, assembled in the followingorder:<ITAG tagnum="16">______ PART I, Face Sheet (SF-424) has been completed according tothe instructions, includes subpriority area in item 7, is signed by anauthorized official, and has a project summary description attached;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">______ PART II, Project Approval Information;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">______ PART III, Budget Information, sections A, B, C, D, and E arecompleted;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">______ PART IV, Program Narrative, does not exceed 25 pages and includesan organizational capability statement not exceeding 2 pages; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">______ PART V, Assurances.</ITAG>Other Forms: CIVIL RIGHTS:<ITAG tagnum="16">______ Assurance Filed with HHS</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">        or<ITAG tagnum="16">______ Completed Form HHS-441 enclosed</ITAG>APPLICATION CERTIFICATIONS (to be completed by for-profit organizationsapplying for grant support):<ITAG tagnum="16">______ Certifications Included</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">______ Certifications Not Applicable</ITAG>MAILING:<ITAG tagnum="16">______ An Original and 2 copies of the Application</ITAG><T3>B. Points to Remember.</T3>andbullet; At least 25 percent of the TOTAL cost for the proposed demonstrationprojects must come from a source other than the Federal government (1 dollarmatch for every 3 dollars requested by SSA). Research projects requirecost-sharing of 5 percent. An application may be unduly penalized in thereview process by careless errors relating to the computation of the non-Federalshare or match.andbullet; Submit an original and two copies of the application. Six <T3>additional </T3>copies are optional, but will expedite processing.andbullet; Designate in item 7 of the Face Sheet (SF-424) the subpriorityarea under which the application is being submitted. If not submitted inresponse to any of the subpriority areas specified in this announcement,indicate ``nonpriority.``andbullet; APPLICATIONS ARE NOT TO CONTAIN NARRATIVES IN EXCESS OF <T3>25</T3> TYPEWRITTEN DOUBLE-SPACED PAGES (OR <T3>13 </T3>SINGLESPACED PAGES).andbullet; The project summary description of 1,200 characters or less isan essential element of the application. It is important that the summarydescription accurately reflect the nature and scope of the proposed project.andbullet; Follow the recommended format as closely as possible in preparingthe program narrative. The format reflects the evaluative criteria whichwill be used by reviewers to evaluate applications.andbullet; Do not include letters endorsing or supporting the project.andbullet; The qualifications of key staff should be described in a few paragraphsrather than in formal vitae. Vitae or resumes are not to be provided andwill not be included in the applications provided to reviewers.andbullet; Although multiple applications (of different concepts) from thesame applicant are not prohibited, they are not encouraged.andbullet; THE ACTIVITIES BELOW GENERALLY WILL NOT MEET THE PURPOSES OF THISANNOUNCEMENT<ITAG tagnum="15">_projects whose main activity is a conference or meeting;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_projects whose major product is a manual;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_proposals which request expansion or continuation of existing servicesor programs;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_proposals which would establish clearinghouses; or,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_projects which are not within the goals and objectives of this announcement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4190-11-M011</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 3 1050_1060</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4190-11-C</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Notice</ITAG>GRANT FUNDS MAY NOT BE USED TO ATTEMPT TO INFLUENCE LEGISLATION PENDINGBEFORE CONGRESS.We direct the attention of potential HHS grantees to the fact that thefollowing statutory provision (part of Sec. 407 of Pub. L. 95-480, 92 Stat.1589) has applied to the Department's appropriations beginning with thosefor fiscal year 1979 and that such a provision is likely to continue toapply to its appropriations:``No part of any appropriation contained in this Act shall be used to paythe salary or expenses of any grant or contract recipient or agent actingfor such recipient to engage in any activity designed to influence legislationor appropriations pending before the Congress.''This means that the costs of attempting to influence legislation pendingbefore Congress may not be charged either as direct or indirect costs toany HHS grant awarded from funds subject to the provision. Attempting toinfluence legislation is commonly called lobbying.This notice concerns only the charging to HHS grants of certain costs.Nothing in this notice is intended in any way to inhibit or discourageany party from exercising its lawful rights to attempt to influence legislationpending before Congress as long as the costs are not charged to an HSSgrant.<ITAG tagnum="20">Department of Health and Human Services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-9924 Filed 5-3-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4190-11-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>